apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="abb/eißen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>eißend</l>    <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiße</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiße</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiße</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißest</l>    <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißet</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißt</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißt</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißt</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isse</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isse</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issest</l>    <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isset</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iss</l>       <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iss</l>       <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isst</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isst</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="br/echen#_ab__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>achen</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>achen</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächen</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächen</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äche</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äche</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächest</l>    <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächet</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>achst</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>acht</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echen</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echen</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echen</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echen</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eche</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eche</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eche</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echest</l>    <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echet</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echt</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echt</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ichst</l>     <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>icht</l>      <r>echen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="abbeißen">        <i>abb</i><par n="abb/eißen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="abbrechen">       <i>br</i><par n="br/echen#_ab__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="anbrechen">       <i>br</i><par n="br/echen#_ab__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aufbrechen">      <i>br</i><par n="br/echen#_ab__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ausbrechen">      <i>br</i><par n="br/echen#_ab__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="einbrechen">      <i>br</i><par n="br/echen#_ab__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="herausbrechen">   <i>br</i><par n="br/echen#_ab__vblex_sep"/></e>
